Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.155

Supervisor of natural resources—Appointment.

The supervisor shall be appointed by the administrator with the advice and consent of the board. The supervisor shall serve at the pleasure of the administrator.

[ 2003 c 334 s 105; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.060. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.30.060.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.